test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-INTR-IPFV-0-itsiy_cry.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - itsiy[cry] :
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg1:       istsiy
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg2:       nitsiy
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg3:       itsiy
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl1:       [isiìtsiy, isaàtsiy]
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl1+Distr: [dààsiìtsiy, dààsaàtsiy]
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl2:       astsiy
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl2+Distr: dàstsiy
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl3:       gitsiy
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl3+Distr: dàgitsiy
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg4:       ts'itsiy
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg4+Distr: dàts'itsiy
